Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Subchapter 4. Liens on Logs for Wages

§ 1991.
Nature and extent of lien.

A person cutting or drawing logs and acting under a contract with the owner thereof shall have a lien thereon for his or her wages that shall continue 60 days after the services are performed and have precedence of other claims except public taxes.
Such lien shall not attach until the person claiming it files in the office of the clerk of the town where he or she performed the service, or if the town is unorganized, in the county clerk’s office, a brief statement of the contract under which he or she claims a lien and his or her purpose to enforce it against the property for the amount due for such service.

§ 1992.
Action to enforce lien.

Such lien shall be void against a subsequent purchaser, unless an action is brought and the logs attached thereon within 30 days from the time the plaintiff’s right of action accrues against the person for whom he or she performed the services, and shall be void as to all persons, unless an action is brought and the logs attached thereon within 60 days from such time.

§ 1993.
Procedure for attaching logs.

Such attachment shall be made by leaving a copy of the process in the office of the clerk of the town where the services were performed and also where the logs are located.
If either town is unorganized, a copy of such process shall be left in the county clerk’s office.